Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1044.
do enact as follows:AB1044,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1044,28Section 2. 20.435 (7) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1044,2,11920.435 (7) (bm) Patient lift devices grant program. As a continuing 10appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for patient lift device grants and data 11collection under s. 146.619.AB1044,312Section 3. 146.619 of the statutes is created to read:AB1044,2,1413146.619 Patient lift devices grant program. (1) Definitions. In this 14section:AB1044,2,1515(a) “Adult family home” has the meaning given in s. 50.01 (1).AB1044,2,1716(b) “Community-based residential facility” has the meaning given in s. 50.01 17(1g).AB1044,2,1818(c) “Nursing home” has the meaning given in s. 50.01 (3).AB1044,2,2019(d) “Residential care apartment complex” has the meaning given in s. 50.01 20(6d).AB1044,3,221(2) Grants. (a) The department shall establish and administer a program to 22award grants to adult family homes, community-based residential facilities, 1nursing homes, and residential care apartment complexes for the purchase of 2patient lift devices that comply with the requirements of par. (d) 1. to 4.AB1044,3,83(b) An adult family home, community-based residential facility, nursing 4home, or residential care apartment complex that desires to participate in the grant 5program under this subsection shall file an application with the department. The 6department shall award grants to applicants on the basis of criteria determined by 7the department that includes an agreement that the applicant will participate in 8data reporting as specified under sub. (3) (a).AB1044,3,109(c) A recipient of a grant under this subsection shall report data as specified 10under sub. (3) (a).AB1044,3,1211(d) Moneys awarded under this subsection shall be expended for the purchase 12of patient lift devices that meet all of the following requirements:AB1044,3,13131. Are approved by the department.AB1044,3,14142. Can be operated independently by a patient or resident.AB1044,3,15153. Can be operated by or with the assistance of facility staff.AB1044,3,16164. Aid in mechanically lifting a human.AB1044,3,2017(3) Data reporting and collection. (a) The department shall specify the 18type and form of data reporting required for recipients of grants under sub. (2). The 19department shall facilitate the collection and analysis of the reported data. The 20department may contract with a 3rd party to implement this paragraph.AB1044,3,2221(b) No more than $100,000 from the appropriation under s. 20.435 (7) (bm) 22may be expended on data collection and analysis under par. (a).AB1044,3,2323